Montana, session 2025, HB403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Legislative access. (1) A legislator must have immediate, unlimited access at all times to
the Montana state hospital.
(2) A legislator seeking access to the Montana state hospital is subject to routine security and
safety procedures of the facility or program.
(3) While in the Montana state hospital, a legislator shall prioritize and respect the health, dignity,
privacy, and welfare of Montana state hospital patients.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
53, chapter 21, part 6, and the provisions of Title 53, chapter 21, part 6, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 403
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 403, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 403
INTRODUCED BY D. HAWK, S. NOVAK, M. LEE, J. SECKINGER, S. FYANT, E. BUTTREY, R. MARSHALL,
D. HARVEY, S. VINTON, C. GLIMM, G. OBLANDER, F. NAVE, B. USHER, B. BARKER, J. COHENOUR, S.
HOWELL, J. KARLEN, D. LENZ, T. MCGILLVRAY, B. BEARD, S. DEMAROIS, J. LYNCH
AN ACT REQUIRING THE MONTANA STATE HOSPITAL TO GRANT ACCESS TO A LEGISLATOR.